South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Extension of Lexington County School District Property Tax Relief Act SECTION 1.    Pursuant to Section 3(A) of Act 378 of 2004, the one percent special sales and use tax imposed by the Lexington County School District Property Tax Relief Act, and extended by Act 278 of 2018, is extended for an additional seven years. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________